Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 4751.
Declaration of policy.

It is hereby declared to be in the public interest to foster and promote timely expenditures by municipalities for water systems, clean water projects, and solid waste management, each of which is declared to be an essential governmental function when undertaken and implemented by a municipality. It is also declared to be in the public interest to promote expenditures for certain existing privately owned public water systems and certain privately owned potable water supply systems to bring those systems into compliance with federal and State standards and to protect public health and the environment. Additionally, it is declared to be in the public interest to promote clean water projects to protect and improve the quality of waters of the State.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 75

, § 1; amended

1997, No. 62

, § 65, eff. June 26, 1997;

1999, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 50, eff. May 24, 2000;

2007, No. 52

, § 45, eff. May 28, 2007;

2015, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 24, eff. May 12, 2016;

2017, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 28, 2018.

§ 4752.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Agency” means the Agency of Natural Resources.

“Bond Bank” means the Vermont Municipal Bond Bank established by section 4571 of this title.

“Municipality” means any city, town, village, town school district, incorporated school district, union school district, or other school district, fire district, consolidated sewer district, consolidated water district, solid waste district, or statewide or regional water quality utility or mechanism organized under laws of the State.

“Municipal bond” means a bond or note or evidence of debt constituting a general obligation of a municipality.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Natural Resources or his or her authorized representative.

“Noncommunity water system” shall have the same meaning as in

10 V.S.A. § 1671

.

“Privately owned water system” means any water system that is not owned or operated by a municipality.

“Community water system” shall have the same meaning as in

10 V.S.A. § 1671

.

“Public water supply systems” means a public water system as that term is defined in

10 V.S.A. § 1671

, except for bottled water facilities and for-profit noncommunity systems, which includes water systems, water treatment plants, structures, pipe lines, storage facilities, pumps, and attendant facilities necessary to develop a source of water, and to treat and convey it in proper quantity and quality.

[Repealed.]

“Clean water project” means “water pollution abatement and control facilities,” as defined in

10 V.S.A. § 1571

, and such equipment, conveyances, structural or nonstructural facilities, and natural resources projects that are needed for and appurtenant to the prevention, management, treatment, storage, or disposal of stormwater, sewage, or waste, or that provide water quality benefits, including a wastewater treatment facility, combined sewer separation facilities, an indirect discharge system, a wastewater system, flood resiliency work related to a structural facility, or a groundwater protection project.

“Disadvantaged municipality” means a municipality or the served area of a municipality that:

has a median household income below the State average median household income as determined by the Secretary and that, after construction of the proposed water supply improvements, will have an annual household user cost greater than one percent of the median household income as determined by the Secretary; or

has a median household income equal to or greater than the State average median household income as determined by the Secretary and that, after construction of the proposed water supply improvements, will have an annual household user cost greater than 2.5 percent of the median household income as determined by the Secretary.

“Potable water supply” shall have the same meaning as in

10 V.S.A. § 1972

.

“Sewage” shall have the same meaning as used in section 3501 of this chapter.

“Stormwater” shall have the same meaning as stormwater runoff in section 1264 of this title.

“Waste” shall have the same meaning as used in

10 V.S.A. § 1251

.

“Designer” means a person authorized to design wastewater systems and potable water supplies as identified in

10 V.S.A. § 1975

.

“Natural resources project” means a project to protect, conserve, or restore natural resources, including the acquisition of easements and land, for the purpose of providing water quality benefits.

“Sponsorship program” means an arrangement in which natural resources projects are paired with water pollution abatement and control facilities projects, as defined in

10 V.S.A. § 1571

, for the purposes of water quality improvement. Under the sponsorship program, a municipality may obtain a loan for both a natural resources project and a water pollution abatement and control facilities project. The loan rate and terms shall be adjusted to forgive all or a portion of the natural resources project over the life of the loan. Only municipalities and nonprofit organizations may receive funds under a sponsorship program.

“Hardship municipality” means a municipality served by a municipally owned public community water system that:

has a residential population of 250 or less;

has an annual household user cost that exceeds $1,000.00 or 1.5 percent of the median household income after construction of the water supply improvements project as determined by the Secretary; and

requires improvements to address an imminent public health hazard or a substantial threat to public health as determined by the Secretary.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 75

, § 1; amended

1987, No. 76

, § 18;

1989, No. 30

, § 8, eff. April 27, 1989;

1989, No. 276

(Adj. Sess.), § 36, eff. June 20, 1990;

1997, No. 62

, § 66, eff. June 26, 1997;

1999, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 51, eff. May 24, 2000;

2011, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 30, eff. May 14, 2012;

2015, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 25, eff. May 12, 2016;

2017, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 20, eff. May 22, 2018;

2017, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 28, 2018;

2017, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 19;

2019, No. 72

, § E.700.

§ 4753.
Revolving loan funds; authority to spend; report.

There is hereby established a series of special funds to be known as:

The Vermont Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) Pollution Control Revolving Fund, which shall be used, consistent with federal law, to provide loans for planning and construction of clean water projects, including acquisitions of project-related easements, land, options to purchase land, and temporary or permanent rights-of-way, and for implementing related management programs.

The Vermont Pollution Control Revolving Fund, which shall be used to provide loans to municipalities and State agencies for planning and construction of clean water projects, including acquisitions of project-related easements, land, options to purchase land, and temporary or permanent rights-of-way.

The Vermont Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) Drinking Water State Revolving Fund, which shall be used to provide loans to municipalities and certain privately owned water systems for:

planning, designing, constructing, repairing, or improving public water supply systems, including acquisitions of project-related easements, land, options to purchase land, and temporary or permanent rights-of-way, in order to comply with State and federal standards and protect public health and the environment; and

implementing related management programs.

The Vermont Solid Waste Revolving Fund, which shall be used to provide loans to municipalities, including union municipal districts formed under chapter 121, subchapter 3 of this title, for planning solid waste handling and disposal facilities as enumerated in section 2203a of this title, and for constructing publicly owned solid waste handling and disposal facilities as enumerated in section 2203a of this title.

The Vermont Drinking Water Planning Loan Fund, which shall be used to provide loans to municipalities and privately owned, nonprofit community water systems, for conducting feasibility studies and for the preparation of preliminary engineering planning studies and final engineering plans and specifications for improvements to public water supply systems in order to comply with State and federal standards and to protect public health. The Secretary may forgive up to $50,000.00 of the unpaid balance of a loan made from the Vermont Drinking Water Planning Loan Fund to municipalities after project construction is substantially completed or upon approval of a plan. The Secretary shall establish amounts, eligibility, policies, and procedures for loan forgiveness in the annual State Intended Use Plan (IUP), as required by the Safe Drinking Water Act,

42 U.S.C. § 300f

et seq., with public review and comment prior to finalization and submission to the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.

The Vermont Drinking Water Source Protection Fund, which shall be used to provide loans to municipalities for purchasing land or conservation easements in order to protect public water sources and ensure compliance with State and federal drinking water regulations.

The Vermont Drinking Water Emergency Use Fund, which shall be within the control of the Secretary. Disbursements from the Fund may be made by the Secretary for costs required to undertake the following emergency actions that the Secretary considers necessary to protect public health:

collecting and analyzing samples of drinking water;

hiring contractors to perform or cause to be performed infrastructure repairs of public water supply systems;

hiring certified operators to perform operational activities at public water supply systems; and

providing or causing to be provided bottled or bulk water for public water supply systems due to problems with quality or quantity, or both.

[Repealed.]

The Vermont Drinking Water Revolving Loan Fund, which shall be used to provide loans to a municipality for the design, land acquisition, if necessary, and construction of a potable water supply when a household in the municipality has been disconnected involuntarily from a public water supply system for reasons other than nonpayment of fees.

The Vermont Wastewater and Potable Water Revolving Loan Fund, which shall be used to provide loans to individuals, in accordance with section 4763b of this title, for the design and construction of repairs to or replacement of wastewater systems and potable water supplies when the wastewater system or potable water supply is a failed system or supply as defined in

10 V.S.A. § 1972

, or when a designer demonstrates that the wastewater system or potable water supply has a high probability of failing. The amount of up to $275,000.00 from the fees collected pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 2822(j)(4)

shall be deposited into this Fund at the beginning of each fiscal year to ensure a minimum balance of available funds of $275,000.00 exists for each fiscal year.

Each of such funds shall be established and held separate and apart from any other funds or monies of the State and shall be used and administered exclusively for the purpose of this chapter with the exception of transferring funds from the Vermont Drinking Water Planning Loan Fund and the Vermont Drinking Water Source Protection Fund to the Vermont Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) Drinking Water State Revolving Fund, and from the Vermont Pollution Control Revolving Fund to the Vermont Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) Pollution Control Revolving Fund, when authorized by the Secretary.
(b) (1) Each of such funds shall be established and held separate and apart from any other funds or monies of the State and shall be used and administered exclusively for the purpose of this chapter with the exception of transferring funds from the Vermont Drinking Water Planning Loan Fund and the Vermont Drinking Water Source Protection Fund to the Vermont Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) Drinking Water State Revolving Fund, and from the Vermont Pollution Control Revolving Fund to the Vermont Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) Pollution Control Revolving Fund, when authorized by the Secretary.

These funds shall be administered by the Bond Bank on behalf of the State, except that:

the Vermont EPA Drinking Water State Revolving Fund shall be administered by VEDA concerning loans to privately owned public water systems in accordance with subchapter 3 of this chapter;

the Vermont Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) Pollution Control Revolving Fund shall be administered by VEDA concerning loans to private entities for clean water projects in accordance with subchapter 4 of this chapter; and

the Vermont Wastewater and Potable Water Revolving Loan Fund may be administered by a community development financial institution, as that term is defined in 12 U.S.C. § 4702, that is contracted with by the State for the purpose of providing loans to individuals for failed wastewater systems and potable water supplies in accordance with section 4763b of this chapter.

The funds shall be invested in the same manner as permitted for investment of funds belonging to the State or held in the Treasury.

The funds shall consist of the following:

such sums as may be appropriated or transferred thereto from time to time by the General Assembly, the State Emergency Board, or the Joint Fiscal Committee during such times as the General Assembly is not in session;

principal and interest received from the repayment of loans made from each of such funds;

capitalization grants and awards made to the State by the United States of America for any of the purposes for which such funds have been established;

interest earned from the investment of fund balances;

private gifts, bequests, and donations made to the State for any of the purposes for which such funds have been established; and

other funds from any public or private source intended for use for any of the purposes for which such funds have been established.

In addition to the purposes established in subsection (a) of this section, the various loan funds created by this section may be used for one or more of the purposes established in section 4757 of this title.

[Repealed.]

The Secretary may bring an action under this subsection or other available State and federal laws against the owner or permittee of the public water supply systems to seek reimbursement to the Vermont Drinking Water Emergency Use Fund for all disbursements from the Fund made pursuant to subdivision (a)(7) of this section. To the extent compatible with the urgency of the situation, the Secretary shall provide an opportunity for the responsible water system owner or permittee to undertake the necessary actions under the direction of the Secretary prior to making disbursements.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 75

, § 1; amended

1993, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 62, eff. June 21, 1994;

1995, No. 62

, § 44, eff. April 26, 1995;

1997, No. 62

, § 67, eff. June 26, 1997;

1997, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1997, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 51, eff. April 29, 1998;

1999, No. 109

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1999, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 52, eff. May 24, 2000;

2001, No. 61

, § 38, eff. June 16, 2001;

2001, No. 109

(Adj. Sess.), § 11; eff. May 16, 2002;

2001, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 90, eff. June 27, 2002;

2003, No. 63

, § 50, eff. June 11, 2003;

2007, No. 52

, §§ 43, 46, eff. May 28, 2007;

2007, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. May 12, 2008;

2011, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 28e, eff. May 7, 2012;

2011, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

2013, No. 137

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 22, 2014;

2015, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 26, eff. May 12, 2016;

2015, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § E.709.2, eff. June 8, 2016;

2017, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 21, eff. May 22, 2018;

2017, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 28, 2018;

2017, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 20;

2019, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 13, 2020.

§ 4753a.
Awards from revolving loan funds.

Pollution control. The General Assembly shall approve all categories of awards made from the special funds established by section 4753 of this title for water pollution abatement and facility construction, in order to assure that such awards conform with State policy on water quality and pollution abatement, and with the State policy that municipal entities shall receive first priority in the award of public monies for such construction, including monies returned to the revolving funds from previous awards. To facilitate this legislative oversight, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall annually on or before January 15 report to the House Committees on Corrections and Institutions and on Natural Resources, Fish, and Wildlife and the Senate Committees on Institutions and on Natural Resources and Energy on all awards made from the relevant special funds during the prior and current fiscal years, and shall report on and seek legislative approval of all the types of projects for which awards are proposed to be made from the relevant special funds during the current or any subsequent fiscal year. Where feasible, the specific projects shall be listed. The provisions of

2 V.S.A. § 20(d)

(expiration of required reports) shall not apply to the report to be made under this subsection.

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

Loan forgiveness; pollution control. Notwithstanding any other provision of law regarding loan forgiveness, upon the award of a loan from the Vermont Environmental Protection Agency Pollution Control Revolving Fund (CWSRF), the Secretary of Natural Resources, in a manner that is consistent with federal grant provisions, may provide loan forgiveness.

Loan forgiveness; drinking water.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law regarding loan forgiveness, upon the award of a loan from the Vermont Environmental Protection Agency Drinking Water State Revolving Fund (DWSRF), the Secretary of Natural Resources, in a manner that is consistent with federal grant provisions, may provide loan forgiveness.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law regarding loan forgiveness, upon the award of a loan from the Vermont Drinking Water State Revolving Loan Fund, the Secretary of Natural Resources may provide loan forgiveness for preliminary engineering and final design costs when a municipality undertakes such engineering on behalf of a household that has been disconnected involuntarily from a public water supply system for reasons other than nonpayment of fees, provided it is not the same municipality that is disconnecting the household.

Loan forgiveness standard. The Secretary shall establish standards, policies, and procedures as necessary for implementing subsections (d) and (e) of this section for allocating the funds among projects and for revising standard priority lists in order to comply with requirements associated with federal capitalization grant agreements.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 52, eff. April 29, 1998; amended

2007, No. 52

, § 47, eff. May 28, 2007;

2011, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2011, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2013, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 40;

2015, No. 26

, § 39, eff. May 18, 2015;

2015, No. 97

(Adj. Sess.), § 58;

2015, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 27, eff. May 12, 2016;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 159a.

§ 4753b.
Acceptance of funds.

The Commissioner of Environmental Conservation, with the approval of the Secretary of Natural Resources, may accept federal grants made available through the federal Clean Water Act and the federal Drinking Water Act in accordance with this chapter. Acceptance of this grant money is hereby approved, provided all notifications are made under subsection 4760(a) of this title.

The Commissioner shall report receipt of a grant under this section to the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Institutions and the House Committee on Corrections and Institutions and the Joint Fiscal Committee.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 43

, § 38, eff. May 27, 2009; amended

2013, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 41;

2015, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 28.